Utah statutes.
72-7-504.5.   Public assembly facility signs -- Restrictions.

(1)  Signs on the premises of a public assembly facility that do not bring rental income to the owner of the public assembly facility may advertise:

(a)  the name of the facility, including identifiable venues or stores within the facility; and

(b)  principal or accessory products or services offered on the property and activities conducted on the property as permitted by 23 C.F.R. Section 750.709, including:

(i)  events being conducted in the facility or upon the premises, including the sponsor of the current event; and

(ii)  products or services sold at the facility and activities conducted on the property that produce significant income to the operation of the facility.

(2)  An advertising structure described in Subsection (1):

(a)  shall be located on a public assembly facility or on a parcel contiguous to the public assembly facility;

(b)  shall be under the same ownership as the public assembly facility; and

(c)  may not be separated from the public assembly facility by a public road.

(3)  An advertising structure described in Subsection (1) may only promote a maximum of seven major sponsors and the sponsor of a current event at any one time.

(4)  An advertising structure described in Subsection (1) may not be located on narrow land held by easement or anything other than a fee interest unless it is a part of a public assembly facility.

(5)  A public assembly facility is exempt from the requirement under this part to have a state outdoor advertising permit.



Amended by Chapter 346, 2011 General Session

